Washington statutes.
RCW 35.43.042

Authority to establish utility local improvement districts—Procedure.

Whenever the legislative authority of any city or town has provided pursuant to law for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, purchase, condemnation and purchase, addition to, repair, or renewal of the whole or any portion of a:

(1) System for providing the city or town and the inhabitants thereof with water, which system includes as a whole or as a part thereof water mains, hydrants or appurtenances which are authorized subjects for local improvements under RCW 35.43.040(13) or other law; or a

(2) System for providing the city or town with sewerage and storm or surface water disposal, which system includes as a whole or as a part thereof drains, sewers or sewer appurtenances which are authorized subjects for local improvements under RCW 35.43.040(7) or other law; or

(3) Off-street parking facilities; and

Has further provided in accordance with any applicable provisions of the Constitution or statutory authority for the issuance and sale of revenue bonds to pay the cost of all or a portion of any such system, such legislative authority shall have the authority to establish utility local improvement districts, and to levy special assessments on all property specially benefited by any such local improvement to pay in whole or in part the damages or costs of any local improvements so provided for.

The initiation and formation of such utility local improvement districts and the levying, collection and enforcement of assessments shall be in the manner and subject to the same procedures and limitations as are now or hereafter provided by law for the initiation and formation of local improvement districts in cities and towns and the levying, collection and enforcement of assessments pursuant thereto.

It must be specified in any petition or resolution initiating the formation of such a utility local improvement district in a city or town and in the ordinance ordered pursuant thereto, that the assessments shall be for the sole purpose of payment into such revenue bond fund as may be specified by the legislative authority for the payment of revenue bonds issued to defray the cost of such system or facilities or any portion thereof as provided for in this section.

Assessments in any such utility local improvement district may be made on the basis of special benefits up to but not in excess of the total cost of the local improvements portion of any system or facilities payable by issuance of revenue bonds. No warrants or bonds shall be issued in any such utility local improvement district, but the collection of interest and principal on all assessments in such utility local improvement district, when collected, shall be paid into any such revenue bond fund.

When in the petition or resolution for establishment of a local improvement district and in the ordinance ordered pursuant thereto, it is specified or provided that the assessments shall be for the sole purpose of payment into a revenue bond fund for the payment of revenue bonds, then the local improvement district shall be designated a "utility local improvement district".

The provisions of chapters 35.45, 35.47 and 35.48 RCW shall have no application to utility local improvement districts created under authority of this section.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 258 s 2; 1967 c 52 s 1.]

NOTES:

Construction—1967 c 52: "The authority granted by this 1967 amendatory act shall be considered an alternative and additional method of securing payment of revenue bonds issued for the purposes specified in RCW 35.43.042 and shall not be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any other method for providing for the payment of any such revenue bonds." [ 1967 c 52 s 27.]

Severability—1967 c 52: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1967 c 52 s 29.]